Illinois, session 104th, HB1708.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 16-5.01 and by adding Section 16-5.02 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/16-5.01)  (from Ch. 46, par. 16-5.01)7    Sec. 16-5.01. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this 8Code, the election authority shall, at least 46 days prior to 9the date of any election at which federal officers are elected 10and 45 days prior to any other regular election, have a 11sufficient number of ballots printed so that such ballots will 12be available for mailing 45 days prior to the date of the 13election to persons who have filed application for a ballot 14under the provisions of Article 20 of this Code.15    (b) If at any election at which federal offices are 16elected or nominated the election authority is unable to 17comply with the provisions of subsection (a), the election 18authority shall mail to each such person, in lieu of the 19ballot, a Special Write-in Vote by Mail Voter's Blank Ballot. 20The Special Write-in Vote by Mail Voter's Blank Ballot shall 21be used at all elections at which federal officers are elected 22or nominated and shall be prepared by the election authority 23in substantially the following form:  HB1708- 2 -LRB104 08753 SPS 18807 b1Special Write-in Vote by Mail Voter's Blank Ballot2    (To vote for a person, write the title of the office and 3his or her name on the lines provided. Place to the left of and 4opposite the title of office a square and place a cross (X) in 5the square.)6        Title of Office                 Name of Candidate7(    )                         8(    )                         9(    )                         10(    )                         11(    )                         12(    )                                                   13    The election authority shall send with the Special 14Write-in Vote by Mail Voter's Blank Ballot a list of all 15referenda for which the voter is qualified to vote and all 16candidates for whom nomination papers have been filed and for 17whom the voter is qualified to vote. The voter shall be 18entitled to write in the name of any candidate seeking 19election and any referenda for which he or she is entitled to 20vote.21    On the back or outside of the ballot, so as to appear when 22folded, shall be printed the words "Official Ballot", the date 23of the election and a facsimile of the signature of the 24election authority who has caused the ballot to be printed.25    The provisions of Article 20, insofar as they may be 26applicable to the Special Write-in Vote by Mail Voter's Blank   HB1708- 3 -LRB104 08753 SPS 18807 b1Ballot, shall be applicable herein.2    (c) Notwithstanding any provision of this Code or other 3law to the contrary, the governing body of a municipality may 4adopt, upon submission of a written statement by the 5municipality's election authority attesting to the 6administrative ability of the election authority to administer 7an election using a ranked ballot to the municipality's 8governing body, an ordinance requiring, and that 9municipality's election authority shall prepare, a ranked vote 10by mail ballot for municipal and township office candidates to 11be voted on in the consolidated election or consolidated 12primary election. This ranked ballot shall be for use only by a 13qualified voter who either is a member of the United States 14military or will be outside of the United States on the 15consolidated primary election day and the consolidated 16election day. The governing body of a municipality may adopt 17an ordinance allowing any qualified voter to use a ranked vote 18by mail ballot for any municipal and township election. The 19ranked ballot shall contain a list of the titles of all 20municipal and township offices potentially contested at both 21the consolidated primary election and the consolidated 22election and the candidates for each office and shall permit 23the elector to vote in the consolidated election by indicating 24his or her order of preference for each candidate for each 25office. To indicate his or her order of preference for each 26candidate for each office, the voter shall put the number one   HB1708- 4 -LRB104 08753 SPS 18807 b1next to the name of the candidate who is the voter's first 2choice, the number 2 for his or her second choice, and so forth 3so that, in consecutive numerical order, a number indicating 4the voter's preference is written by the voter next to each 5candidate's name on the ranked ballot. The voter shall not be 6required to indicate his or her preference for more than one 7candidate on the ranked ballot. The voter may not cast a 8write-in vote using the ranked ballot for the consolidated 9election. The election authority shall, if using the ranked 10vote by mail ballot authorized by this subsection, also 11prepare instructions for use of the ranked ballot. The ranked 12ballot for the consolidated election shall be mailed to the 13voter at the same time that the ballot for the consolidated 14primary election is mailed to the voter and the election 15authority shall accept the completed ranked ballot for the 16consolidated election when the authority accepts the completed 17ballot for the consolidated primary election.18    The voter shall also be sent a vote by mail ballot for the 19consolidated election for those races that are not related to 20the results of the consolidated primary election as soon as 21the consolidated election ballot is certified. 22    The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules for 23election authorities for the implementation of this 24subsection, including, but not limited to, the application for 25and counting of ranked ballots. 26(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   HB1708- 5 -LRB104 08753 SPS 18807 b1    (10 ILCS 5/16-5.02 new)2    Sec. 16-5.02. Ranked ballot; nonpartisan primary 3elections.4    (a) The State Board of Elections is authorized to adopt 5rules mandating all election authorities to conduct all State, 6local, and federal primary elections, excluding the 7presidential primary, using a ranked ballot method.8    (b) This Section applies only if more than 2 candidates 9have been nominated for an office.10    (c) All qualified voters shall be permitted to vote for 11the candidate of their choice in a primary election regardless 12of their political party affiliation.13    (d) Any person who meets the primary election 14qualifications may petition as a candidate in a primary 15election as a member of the political party in which the 16candidate is registered.17    (e) All candidates shall be listed on a single primary 18ballot. The ballot shall clearly designate the party in which 19each candidate is registered. The top 2 candidates as 20determined by the ranked ballot method shall advance to the 21general election regardless of political party affiliation. 22The winner of the election shall be the candidate that 23receives the greatest number of votes cast in the general 24election.25    (f) For offices subject to the ranked ballot method, the   HB1708- 6 -LRB104 08753 SPS 18807 b1ballot shall be simple and easy to understand and allow a voter 2to rank candidates for an office based on preference.3    (g) Instructions on the ballot shall conform substantially 4to the following specifications:5        "Vote for candidates by indicating your first-choice 6    candidates in order of preference. Indicate your first 7    choice by marking the number "1" beside a candidate's 8    name, your second choice by marking the number "2" beside 9    a candidate's name, your third choice by marking a number 10    "3" beside a candidate's name, and so on in ascending 11    numerical order.12        You may choose to rank only one candidate, but ranking 13    additional candidates will not hurt the chances of your 14    first-choice candidate. You may not rank more than 5 15    candidates. Do not mark the same number beside more than 16    one candidate. Do not skip numbers."17    (h) A sample ballot for an office subject to the ranked 18ballot method shall illustrate the voting procedure for the 19ranked ballot method. A sample ballot shall be included with 20each absentee ballot.21    (i) The State Board of Elections shall conduct a voter 22education campaign on the ranked ballot system to familiarize 23voters with the ballot design, method of voting, and 24advantages of determining a majority winner in a single 25election. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   HB1708- 7 -LRB104 08753 SPS 18807 b11, 2026.